Louisiana, session 2026, SB511.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1289.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1289.2. Automobile repairs; insurers prohibition; liability transparency for
repair shops; insurer liability
A. As used in this Section, "steering" means any communication by an
insurer to a policyholder or third-party claimant to directly or indirectly
influence a policyholder or third-party claimant or provide the policyholder or
third-party claimant with the option to use an automobile repair shop that is a
preferred carve-out or is in a strategic relationship with the insurer or in which
the insurer maintains an ownership interest or controls or contracts with to
provide automobile repairs to its policyholders.
B. An insurer shall disclose the following to a policyholder or third-party
claimant:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1506 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 511
(1) The right to choose his own repair shop and services.
(2) Preferred repair shops and services are optional and not a condition
of payment of a claim.
C. An insurer is prohibited from any of the following:
(1) Offering incentives or discounts to policyholders or third-party
claimants for using preferred shops.
(2) Requiring policyholders or third-party claimants to use preferred
repair shops or service providers.
(3) Steering policyholders or third-party claimants toward preferred
repair shops or service providers.
D.(1) A repair shop shall disclose when nonoriginal equipment
manufacturer parts (non-OEM) or nonstandard parts are used in making
repairs.
(2)(a) A repair shop shall obtain written consent from policyholders or
third-party claimants before using non-OEM parts or nonstandard parts in
making repairs.
(b) The written consent shall include a signed release by the policyholder
or third-party claimant acknowledging the risks and accepting liability for the
use of nonOEM or nonstandard parts in making repairs.
(3) If the insurer pressures the policyholder or third-party claimant into
accepting substandard repairs through the use of non-OEM or nonstandard
parts, liability for any resulting safety issues shall reside with the insurer.